Nebraska, session 109, LB719.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-12,203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,203 Project means expenses incurred or to be incurred at one
qualified location for:
(1) Site acquisition and preparation, transportation infrastructure,
utility extensions, and rail spur construction for the development of a new
industrial rail access business park, including:
(a) Any any such expenses incurred to assist an initial tenant at such
business park that conducts business in the manufacturing, processing,
distribution, or transloading trades; and or
(b) Infrastructure development costs involving property not owned by the
applicant that directly benefit the business park and are critical to the
business park's development, including, but not limited to, acquisition of
rights-of-way, easements, and adjacent properties allowing for street access or
improvements; construction of turning lanes from adjacent major highways;
construction of rail spurs and drop and pull rail yards connected to a main
railroad line; and necessary utility improvements critical to serve the
business park, including water, electric, wastewater, storm water, and natural
gas infrastructure; or
(2) Site acquisition and preparation, transportation infrastructure, or
rail spur construction within thirty miles of the largest artificial reservoir
constructed in this state for the storage of water.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-12,203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-